Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7521
Statistical agents; authorized activities.

A statistical agent may, for the lines of insurance for which it has been licensed:

(1) Develop statistical plans including territorial and class definitions;

(2) Collect and distribute statistical data from insurers or any other source;

(3) Collect, compile, and publish past and current rates charged by individual insurers if such information is also made available to the general public at no more than a reasonable cost;

(4) Collect and compile exposure and loss experience for the purpose of individual risk experience ratings;

(5) Undertake educational activities relating to the collection, compilation, or interpretation of insurance-related data;

(6) Distribute any other information that is filed with the director; and

(7) Furnish any other services, as approved or directed by the director, related to those enumerated in this section.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 21.